Massachusetts, session 194th, H3057.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 39 of chapter 63 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is amended by striking out
subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:--
(b) A minimum tax as follows:
(1) If the total sales of the corporation in the commonwealth during the taxable year, as
determined pursuant to subsection (f) of section 38, are less than $1,000,000, the minimum tax
shall be $456.
(2) If the total sales of the corporation in the commonwealth during the taxable year, as
determined pursuant to subsection (f) of section 38, are equal to or greater than $1,000,000 and
less than $5,000,000, the minimum tax shall be $1,500.
of 2

(3) If the total sales of the corporation in the commonwealth during the taxable year, as
determined pursuant to subsection (f) of section 38, are equal to or greater than $5,000,000 and
less than $10,000,000, the minimum tax shall be $2,500.
(4) If the total sales of the corporation in the commonwealth during the taxable year, as
determined pursuant to subsection (f) of section 38, are equal to or greater than $10,000,000 and
less than $25,000,000, the minimum tax shall be $3,500.
(5) If the total sales of the corporation in the commonwealth during the taxable year, as
determined pursuant to subsection (f) of section 38, are equal to or greater than $25,000,000 and
less than $50,000,000, the minimum tax shall be $5,000.
(6) If the total sales of the corporation in the commonwealth during the taxable year, as
determined pursuant to subsection (f) of section 38, are equal to or greater than $50,000,000 and
less than $100,000,000, the minimum tax shall be $10,000.
(7) If the total sales of the corporation in the commonwealth during the taxable year, as
determined pursuant to subsection (f) of section 38, are equal to or greater than $100,000,000
and less than $500,000,000, the minimum tax shall be $25,000.
(8) If the total sales of the corporation in the commonwealth during the taxable year, as
determined pursuant to subsection (f) of section 38, are equal to or greater than $500,000,000
and less than $1,000,000,000, the minimum tax shall be $75,000.
(9) If the total sales of the corporation in the commonwealth during the taxable year, as
determined pursuant to subsection (f) of section 38, are equal to or greater than $1,000,000,000
the minimum tax shall be $150,000.
of 2